Washington statutes.
RCW 39.100.020

Conditions for financing public improvements.

A local government may finance public improvements using hospital benefit zone financing subject to the following conditions:

(1)(a) The local government adopts an ordinance designating a benefit zone within its boundaries and specifying the public improvements proposed to be financed in whole or in part with the use of hospital benefit zone financing;

(b) A local government may modify the public improvements to be financed in whole or in part with the use of hospital benefit zone financing by amending the ordinance adopted under (a) of this subsection and holding a public hearing consistent with RCW 39.100.030(1)(b); provided that the total cost of the public improvements is not increased;

(2) The public improvements proposed to be financed in whole or in part using hospital benefit zone financing are expected both to encourage private development within the benefit zone and to support the development of a hospital that has received a certificate of need;

(3) Private development that is anticipated to occur within the benefit zone, as a result of the public improvements, will be consistent with the countywide planning policy adopted by the county under RCW 36.70A.210 and the local government's comprehensive plan and development regulations adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW;

(4) The governing body of the local government finds that the public improvements proposed to be financed in whole or in part using hospital benefit zone financing are reasonably likely to:

(a) Increase private investment within the benefit zone;

(b) Increase employment within the benefit zone; and

(c) Generate, over the period of time that the local sales and use tax will be imposed under RCW 82.14.465, excess state excise taxes that are equal to or greater than the state contributions made under this chapter;

(5) The boundaries of a hospital benefit zone may not overlap any part of the boundaries of another hospital benefit zone or a revenue development area defined in chapter 39.102 RCW; and

(6) The boundaries of a hospital benefit zone may not change once the hospital benefit zone is established and approved by the department.

[ 2011 c 363 s 2; 2007 c 266 s 3; 2006 c 111 s 2.]

NOTES:

Finding—Application—Effective date—2007 c 266: See notes following RCW 39.100.010.